src/morphology/lexicon.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Hungarian language
! Copyright © 2015 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
! !!            !!!Hungarian morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !
!! INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Hungarian LANGUAGE.
 

Multichar_Symbols  !!≈ !!!Definitions for @CODE@

!! !!Analysis symbols
!! ----------------
!! The morphological analyses of wordforms for the Hungarian
!! language are presented in this system in terms of the following symbols.
!! (It is highly suggested to follow existing standards when adding new tags).

!! The parts-of-speech are:
 +N +A +Adv +V                                 !!≈
 +Pron +CS +CC +Adp +Po +Pr +Interj +Pcle +Num !!≈

!! The parts of speech are further split up into:
 +Prop +Pers +Dem +Interr +Refl +Recipr +Rel +Indef

!! The Usage extents are marked using following tags:
 +Err/Orth   
 +Use/-Spell 

!! The nominals are inflected in the following Case and Number
 +Sg +Du +Pl

 +Abl	 !!= * @CODE@ Ablative
 +Acc	 !!= * @CODE@ Accusative
 +Ade	 !!= * @CODE@ Adessive
 +All	 !!= * @CODE@ Allative
 +Cau	 !!= * @CODE@ Causative
 +Del	 !!= * @CODE@ Delative
 +Ela	 !!= * @CODE@ Elative
 +Ess/F	 !!= * @CODE@ Formal-Essive
 +Ess/M	 !!= * @CODE@ Modal-Essive
 +Ill 	 !!= * @CODE@ Illative
 +Ine	 !!= * @CODE@ Inessive
 +Ins	 !!= * @CODE@ Instrumental
 +Nom	 !!= * @CODE@ Nominative
 +Ses	 !!= * @CODE@ Superessive
 +Sla	 !!= * @CODE@ Sublative
 +Ter	 !!= * @CODE@ Terminative
 +Tra	 !!= * @CODE@ Translative



!! The possession is marked as such:
 +PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxDu1 +PxDu2 +PxDu3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3
!! The comparative forms are:
 +Comp +Superl
!! Numerals are classified under:
 +Attr +Card
 +Ord 
!! Verb moods are:
 +Ind +Prs +Prt +Pot +Cond +Imprt
!! Verb personal forms are:
 +Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Du1 +Du2 +Du3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3
!! Other verb forms are
 +Inf +Ger +ConNeg +ConNegII +Neg +ImprtII +PrsPrc +PrfPrc +Sup +VGen +VAbess

! Abbreviated words are classified with:
 +ABBR +ACR 
!! Special symbols are classified with:
+CLB +PUNCT +LEFT +RIGHT
!! The verbs are syntactically split according to transitivity:
 +TV +IV
!! Special multiword units are analysed with:
 +Multi
!! Non-dictionary words can be recognised with:
 +Guess

!! Question and Focus particles:
 +Qst +Foc


!! Semantics are classified with
 +Mal +Fem +Sur 
 +Plc 
 +Org
 +Obj
 +Ani
 +Hum
 +Plant
 +Group
 +Time 
 +Txt
 +Route
 +Measr 
 +Wthr
 +Build 
 +Edu
 +Veh
 +Clth


!! Derivations are classified under the morphophonetic form of the suffix, the
!! source and target part-of-speech.
 +V→N +V→V +V→A
 +Der/xxx
 +Der/Assoc_N
 +Der/Poss_N

!! Morphophonology
!! ---------------
!! To represent phonologic variations in word forms we use the following
!! symbols in the lexicon files:
 {aä} {oö} {uü}
 %^Ö2		!!= * @CODE@ h%^Ö2z
 %^V2         !!= * @CODE@ ház%>%^V2al : házzal
!! And following triggers to control variation
 {front} {back}
 %^Hist         !!= * @CODE@ historic documents
 %^Pen         !!= * @CODE@ penultimate position
 %^RmVow       !!= * @CODE@ remove vowel
 %^V2VV        !!= * @CODE@ lengthen vowel
 %^VV2V        !!= * @CODE@ shorten vowel


!! !!Flag diacritics
!! POSSESSOR INDICES or POSSESSIVE SUFFIXES
@U.PX.SG1@
@U.PX.SG2@
@U.PX.SG3@
@U.PX.PL1@
@U.PX.PL2@
@U.PX.PL3@
@D.PX@
@R.PX@
!! FRONT/BACK VOWEL HARMONY
@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@
@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@

!! We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
!! flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
!! with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@    !!≈ | @CODE@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
 @D.NeedNoun.ON@    !!≈ | @CODE@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
 @C.NeedNoun@       !!≈ | @CODE@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
!! 
!! For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
!! to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
!! handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
!! do no harm.
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ !!≈ | @CODE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
 @D.CmpPref.TRUE@  !!≈ | @CODE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
 @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ !!≈ | @CODE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
 @D.CmpLast.TRUE@  !!≈ | @CODE@ | Block such words from entering R
 @D.CmpNone.TRUE@  !!≈ | @CODE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
 @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ !!≈ | @CODE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
 @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@  !!≈ | @CODE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
 @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ !!≈ | @CODE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.
!! 
!! Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
!! nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
!! these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
!! given the proper use of these flags.
 @U.Cap.Obl@        !!≈ | @CODE@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
 @U.Cap.Opt@        !!≈ | @CODE@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

LEXICON Root
!! The word forms in UNDEFINED language start from the lexeme roots of basic
!! word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
0   Nouns       ;
0   Verbs       ;
0   Adjectives  ;
0   Pronouns    ;
0   Numerals    ;
0   Prefixes    ;

LEXICON K
#;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Adjective inflection
!! --------------------
!! The UNDEFINED language adjectives compare.

LEXICON Comparisons
+A+pos:0        Cases   ;
+A+cmp:er       Cases   ;
+A+sup:est      Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Noun inflection
!! ---------------
!! The HUNGARIAN language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON N_HANG__n
! N_jaje
+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+N+Pl0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ok@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+N+Pl+Acc:%>ok%>at # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:%>ot # ;

+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/jA/Unk/OtOk/jUk ;
+N+Pl00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>jai@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_SÖR__n
! N_ae
+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+N+Pl0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ök@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+N+Pl+Acc:%>ök%>et # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:%>t # ;

+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/A/Unk/OtOk/Uk ;
+N+Pl0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ei@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/jA/Unk/OtOk/jUk
PXSG1_Om ;
PXSG2_Od ;
PXSG3_jA ;
PXPL1_Unk ;
PXPL2_OtOk ;
PXPL3_jUk ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/A/Unk/OtOk/Uk
PXSG1_Om ;
PXSG2_Od ;
PXSG3_A ;
PXPL1_Unk ;
PXPL2_OtOk ;
PXPL3_Uk ;

LEXICON PXSG1_Om
000@U.PX.SG1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>om@U.PX.SG1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
000@U.PX.SG1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^Ö2m@U.PX.SG1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON Nouns
alak:alak N_HANG__n ;
árnyalak:árnyalak N_HANG__n ;
bukósisak:bukósisak N_HANG__n ;
csónak:csónak N_HANG__n ;
előhang:előhang N_HANG__n ;
erőszak:erőszak N_HANG__n ;
észak:észak N_HANG__n ;
felhang:felhang N_HANG__n ;
fűrészbak:fűrészbak N_HANG__n ;
hang:hang N_HANG__n ;
időszak:időszak N_HANG__n ;
jak:jak N_HANG__n ;
kajak:kajak N_HANG__n ;
kobak:kobak N_HANG__n ;
korszak:korszak N_HANG__n ;
kupak:kupak N_HANG__n ;
lak:lak N_HANG__n ;
mentőcsónak:mentőcsónak N_HANG__n ;
műszak:műszak N_HANG__n ;
orrhang:orrhang N_HANG__n ;
paplak:paplak N_HANG__n ;
pocak:pocak N_HANG__n ;
réshang:réshang N_HANG__n ;
sisak:sisak N_HANG__n ;
tasak:tasak N_HANG__n ;
törmelékkúp:törmelékkúp N_HANG__n ;
vak:vak N_HANG__n ;
visszhang:visszhang N_HANG__n ;
mézsör:mézsör N_SÖR__n ;
sör:sör N_SÖR__n ;
ajakhang:ajakhang N_HANG__n ;!CORRECTION when two
előhang:előhang N_HANG__n ;!CORRECTION when two
félhang:félhang N_HANG__n ;!CORRECTION when two
negyedhang:negyedhang N_HANG__n ;!CORRECTION when two
összhang:összhang N_HANG__n ;!CORRECTION when two
torokhang:torokhang N_HANG__n ;!CORRECTION when two
zárhang:zárhang N_HANG__n ;!CORRECTION when two
afrik:afrik N_HANG__n ;
ajándék:ajándék N_HANG__n ;
albumin:albumin N_HANG__n ;
alkonypír:alkonypír N_HANG__n ;
állványhíd:állványhíd N_HANG__n ;
alvadék:alvadék N_HANG__n ;
Ármin:Ármin N_HANG__n ;
áruválaszték:áruválaszték N_HANG__n ;
aszpirin:aszpirin N_HANG__n ;
bálnazsír:bálnazsír N_HANG__n ;
Benjámin:Benjámin N_HANG__n ;
biztosíték:biztosíték N_HANG__n ;
brillantin:brillantin N_HANG__n ;
buzér:buzér N_HANG__n ;
csapadék:csapadék N_HANG__n ;
csík:csík N_HANG__n ;
csiszolópapír:csiszolópapír N_HANG__n ;
dámajáték:dámajáték N_HANG__n ;
Dávid:Dávid N_HANG__n ;
dioxid:dioxid N_HANG__n ;
dörzspapír:dörzspapír N_HANG__n ;
előjáték:előjáték N_HANG__n ;
ételmaradék:ételmaradék N_HANG__n ;
ezüstpapír:ezüstpapír N_HANG__n ;
felvonóhíd:felvonóhíd N_HANG__n ;
fennsík:fennsík N_HANG__n ;
folyadék:folyadék N_HANG__n ;
forgatónyomaték:forgatónyomaték N_HANG__n ;
földjáradék:földjáradék N_HANG__n ;
frottír:frottír N_HANG__n ;
fülzsír:fülzsír N_HANG__n ;
galacsin:galacsin N_HANG__n ;
gazolin:gazolin N_HANG__n ;
gleccserszakadék:gleccserszakadék N_HANG__n ;
gyaloghíd:gyaloghíd N_HANG__n ;
gyapjúzsír:gyapjúzsír N_HANG__n ;
gyerekjáték:gyerekjáték N_HANG__n ;
gyík:gyík N_HANG__n ;
hajlék:hajlék N_HANG__n ;
hajóhíd:hajóhíd N_HANG__n ;
hálaajándék:hálaajándék N_HANG__n ;
halánték:halánték N_HANG__n ;
hamuzsír:hamuzsír N_HANG__n ;
harangjáték:harangjáték N_HANG__n ;
hasadék:hasadék N_HANG__n ;
hátralék:hátralék N_HANG__n ;
hemoglobin:hemoglobin N_HANG__n ;
híd:híd N_HANG__n ;
hisztamin:hisztamin N_HANG__n ;
hozadék:hozadék N_HANG__n ;
hulladékpapír:hulladékpapír N_HANG__n ;
húsvagdalék:húsvagdalék N_HANG__n ;
ín:ín N_HANG__n ;
inggallér:inggallér N_HANG__n ;
irányzék:irányzék N_HANG__n ;
ivadék:ivadék N_HANG__n ;
jázmin:jázmin N_HANG__n ;
kankalin:kankalin N_HANG__n ;
karbid:karbid N_HANG__n ;
Katalin:Katalin N_HANG__n ;
kín:kín N_HANG__n ;
kokain:kokain N_HANG__n ;
Konstantin:Konstantin N_HANG__n ;
közjáték:közjáték N_HANG__n ;
ladik:ladik N_HANG__n ;
latin:latin N_HANG__n ;
limuzin:limuzin N_HANG__n ;
magánjáték:magánjáték N_HANG__n ;
mandarin:mandarin N_HANG__n ;
martalék:martalék N_HANG__n ;
mokasszin:mokasszin N_HANG__n ;
muszlin:muszlin N_HANG__n ;
nászajándék:nászajándék N_HANG__n ;
nyomaték:nyomaték N_HANG__n ;
orrváladék:orrváladék N_HANG__n ;
pánik:pánik N_HANG__n ;
parafin:parafin N_HANG__n ;
pír:pír N_HANG__n ;
porcsin:porcsin N_HANG__n ;
prémgallér:prémgallér N_HANG__n ;
rizspapír:rizspapír N_HANG__n ;
sárkánygyík:sárkánygyík N_HANG__n ;
síp:síp N_HANG__n ;
sumer:sumer N_HANG__n ;
szappanbuborék:szappanbuborék N_HANG__n ;
szemaforhíd:szemaforhíd N_HANG__n ;
szomorújáték:szomorújáték N_HANG__n ;
tájék:tájék N_HANG__n ;
támaszték:támaszték N_HANG__n ;
tapír:tapír N_HANG__n ;
tartozék:tartozék N_HANG__n ;
toldalék:toldalék N_HANG__n ;
trapezoid:trapezoid N_HANG__n ;
Ulrik:Ulrik N_HANG__n ;
váladék:váladék N_HANG__n ;
vezérsík:vezérsík N_HANG__n ;
völgyhíd:völgyhíd N_HANG__n ;
zsanér:zsanér N_HANG__n ;
aerobik:aerobik N_HANG__n ;
